North Carolina, session 2025, SB546.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 8A. Clean Energy.
"§ 143B-451.2. Clean energy workforce and innovation.
(a) Title, purpose. – This Part shall be known and may be cited as "The Clean Energy
Workforce and Innovation Act". The purpose of this Act is to accomplish the following:
(1) Develop a skilled workforce in this State to support the deployment of
advanced nuclear energy, small modular reactors, and related clean energy
technologies and facilities.
(2) Accelerate clean energy innovation by streamlining regulatory processes for
small modular reactors and associated infrastructure, ensuring North Carolina
remains a leader in reliable, low-carbon energy.
(3) Expand economic opportunities in energy transition by investing in workforce
training, apprenticeships, and educational partnerships that equip North
Carolinians for high-paying, sustainable careers.
(4) Ensure equitable access to clean energy jobs by prioritizing workforce
development programs in communities affected by fossil fuel plant closures,
economically distressed areas, and underrepresented groups in the energy
sector.
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this Part.
(1) Department. – The Department of Commerce.
(2) Energy sector skilled trade. – Operator certification, welding, precision
machining, grid integration and energy storage expertise, nuclear fuel
management, electrical work, instrumentation and control systems
capabilities, cyber security, reactor maintenance, or any other trade or
occupation related to nuclear energy facilities or generation that does not
require a four-year college degree.
(3) Institution of higher education. – Any public university, community college,
or technical training school in North Carolina offering programs in nuclear
technology, engineering, or energy-sector skilled trades.
(4) Small Modular Reactor (SMR). – A nuclear reactor with a capacity of less
than 500 megawatts per unit, designed for modular construction and advanced
safety features, including passive safety systems using natural cooling
*S546-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
mechanisms to prevent overheating; underground or sealed containment
systems; automatic fail-safe shutdown mechanisms; smaller core and lower
power density componentry; fuel choices that are accident tolerant or capable
of withstanding higher temperatures with lower risk; and security measures
reducing risks from sabotage, aircraft impact, or other external threats.
(c) Clean Energy Workforce Development Program. – There is established in the
Department of Commerce the Clean Energy Workforce Development Program (Program). The
Program shall be comprised of the following elements:
(1) Workforce development. – In conjunction with The University of North
Carolina and the Community Colleges System Office, the Department shall
develop a grant program for institutions of higher education in this State to
expedite and facilitate the expansion of nuclear technology and clean energy
training programs. The Department shall (i) develop guidelines for an
application process for institutions of higher education for the allocation of
funds granted pursuant to this section and (ii) prioritize awarding funds based
on the degree to which the institution has shown in the application the
following:
a. A viable plan to partner and create learning synergies with industry
leaders and employers to align training and real-world clean energy
needs.
b. The funding will be used for nuclear energy workforce needs,
including energy sector skilled trades.
(2) Apprenticeship development. – In conjunction with The University of North
Carolina and the Community Colleges System Office, the Department shall
develop a grant program for subsidizing the costs of qualifying employers for
paid apprenticeship positions for students in institutions of higher education
in the State in order to promote direct-to-hire pathways for participating
students to be prepared for and immediately fill nuclear energy industry
workforce needs. A qualifying employer is an employer currently operating
nuclear energy facilities in the State or in another state and construction
companies and other entities identified by such employers as having the
technical capabilities necessary to design, construct, and maintain nuclear
reactors and equipment for nuclear energy generation. The Department shall
(i) develop guidelines for an application process for qualifying employers for
the allocation of funds granted pursuant to this section and (ii) prioritize
awarding funds based on the degree to which the employer has shown, in the
application or otherwise, the following:
a. A viable plan to partner and create learning synergies and pre- and
post-graduation employment opportunities for student attending
institutions of higher education in the State.
b. The funding will be used to subsidize the total cost of the paid
apprenticeship program created by the qualifying employer and
stipends to participating apprentices to offset living costs.
c. The funding will be used to benefit economically disadvantaged
students. For purposes of this sub-subdivision, an economically
disadvantaged student is one that meets any one or more of the
following:
1. Qualifies for and receives a federal Pell Grant.
2. Is a dependent in a household with income below (i) eighty
percent (80%) of the state median income or (i) the federal
poverty line.
Page 2 Senate Bill 546-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
3. Is a recipient of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
(SNAP) or Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF).
4. Is a child of parents or guardians who did not earn a
postsecondary degree.
5. Residing in a development tier one area, as defined in
G.S. 143B-437.08.
6. Has been displaced, and is transitioning, from a career in coal,
oil, or gas industry jobs and is pursuing educational
advancement for nuclear energy career needs.
d. A history of hiring participating apprentices, economically
disadvantaged employment applicants, and students graduating in
relevant fields from institutions of higher education.
(3) Educational assistance. – In conjunction with The University of North
Carolina and the Community Colleges System Office, the Department shall
develop a scholarship program for students attending institutions of higher
education in this State to offset the cost of tuition and materials for degrees or
certifications in nuclear engineering, electrical engineering, energy sector
skilled trades, and public health radiation protection programs. The
Department shall (i) develop guidelines for an application process for students
of institutions of higher education for the allocation of funds granted pursuant
to this section and (ii) prioritize awarding funds based the degree of need in
the State for the designated coursework, degree, or certification for which the
scholarship is sought. The scholarship assistance program shall include
financial assistance for workers in the energy sector that have been displaced
by the closure of a coal-fired plant that are seeking to transition skills to
nuclear energy generation and technologies.
(4) Veteran initiative. – In conjunction with The University of North Carolina, the
Community Colleges System Office, and the Department of Military and
Veterans Affairs, the Department shall develop a fast-track initiative for
qualifying veterans to facilitate and expedite training, licensure, and transition
into civilian nuclear energy careers. A qualifying veteran is a veteran of a
branch of the armed forces of the United States, with priority being given to
those having naval or other nuclear operations experience. The initiative shall
include a scholarship component for veterans attending institutions of higher
education in this State to offset the cost of relocation, tuition and materials for
degrees, licensure, or certifications in nuclear engineering and related nuclear
technologies, certification exams, and specialized career coaching. The
Department shall (i) develop guidelines for an application process for
qualifying veterans for the allocation of funds granted pursuant to this section
and (ii) prioritize awarding funds based on relevance of nuclear operations in
military service and financial- and merit-based factors determined by the
Department.
SECTION 1.(b) Nuclear Innovation Zones. – The Department of Commerce, in
collaboration with the Department of Environmental Quality, the Utilities Commission, and any
other State agency or entity the Department of Commerce deems relevant, shall conduct a sbtudy
on the feasibility and potential benefits of establishing Nuclear Innovation Zones in the State.
This study shall include the following:
(1) The feasibility of attracting investment and job creation through regulatory
streamlining of permitting nuclear energy production, including related
manufacturing sectors.
(2) Potential incentives to encourage private-sector participation.
Senate Bill 546-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) A review of existing State and federal regulations affecting nuclear energy
development and possible reforms to streamline approval processes while
ensuring public safety.
(4) Site Selection Criteria for potential nuclear energy generating facilities,
including identification of key factors in determining suitable locations such
as proximity to existing energy infrastructure, workforce availability and
training programs, and community impact and local government
considerations.
(5) A review of environmental best practices and necessary safeguards and an
evaluation of potential impacts on air, water, and land use.
(6) A survey of other states' efforts, including examination of successful nuclear
energy development policies and recommendations based on best practices
and lessons learned.
(7) A review of potential State-backed financial mechanisms for nuclear
deployment.
The Department of Commerce shall submit a final report with findings and
recommendations to the Joint Legislative Commission on Energy Policy and the General
Assembly no later than December 31, 2025.
SECTION 2. Article 3J of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is reenacted as it
existed immediately before its repeal and reads as rewritten:
"Article 3J.
Tax Credits for Growing Businesses.
"§ 105-129.80. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) It is the policy of the State of North Carolina to stimulate economic activity
and to create new jobs for the citizens of the State by encouraging and
promoting the expansion of existing business and industry within the State
and by recruiting and attracting new business and industry to the State.
(2) Both short-term and long-term economic trends at the State, national, and
international levels have made the successful implementation of the State's
economic development policy and programs both more critical and more
challenging, and the decline in the State's traditional industries, and the
resulting adverse impact upon the State and its citizens, have been exacerbated
in recent years by adverse national and State economic trends that contribute
to the reduction in the State's industrial base and that inhibit the State's ability
to sustain or attract new and expanding businesses.
(3) The economic condition of the State is not static, and recent changes in the
State's economic condition have created economic distress that requires a
reevaluation of certain existing State programs and the enactment of a new
program as provided in this Article that is designed to stimulate new economic
activity and to create new jobs within the State.
(4) The enactment of this Article is necessary to stimulate the economy and create
new jobs in North Carolina, and this Article will promote the general welfare
and confer, as its primary purpose and effect, benefits on citizens throughout
the State through the creation of new jobs, an enlargement of the overall tax
base, an expansion and diversification of the State's industrial base, and an
increase in revenue to the State and its political subdivisions.
(5) The purpose of this Article is to stimulate economic activity and to create new
jobs within the State.
(6) The State is in need of a focused tax credit program that encourages and
facilitates economic growth and development within the State.
Page 4 Senate Bill 546-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) The resources of the State are not evenly distributed throughout the State and
different communities have different abilities and needs in attracting and
maintaining new and expanding business and industry.
"§ 105-129.81. (See notes) Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Agrarian growth zone. – Defined in G.S. 143B-437.010.
(2) Air courier services. – Defined in G.S. 143B-437.01.
(3) Aircraft maintenance and repair. – The provision of specialized maintenance
or repair services for commercial aircraft or the rebuilding of commercial
aircraft.
(4) Business property. – Tangible personal property that is used in a business and
capitalized by the taxpayer for tax purposes under the Code.
(4a) Clean energy manufacturing. – The manufacture in this State of small modular
reactors, small modular reactor components, reactor modules, or nuclear fuel
assemblies.
(5) Company headquarters. – Defined in G.S. 143B-437.01.
(6) Cost. – In the case of property owned by the taxpayer, cost is determined
pursuant to regulations adopted under section 1012 of the Code. In the case of
property the taxpayer leases from another, cost is value as determined
pursuant to G.S. 105-130.4(j)(2).
(7) Customer service call center. – The provision of support service by a business
to its customers by telephone or other electronic means to support products or
services of the business. For the purposes of this definition, an establishment
is primarily engaged in providing support services by telephone or other
electronic means only if at least sixty percent (60%) of its calls are incoming
or at least sixty percent (60%) of its other electronic communications are
initiated by its customers.
(8) Development tier. – The classification assigned to an area pursuant to
G.S. 143B-437.08.
(9) Electronic shopping and mail order houses. – An industry in electronic
shopping and mail order houses industry group 4541 as defined by NAICS.
(9a) Environmental disqualifying event. – Any of the following occurrences:
a. During the tax year in which the activity occurred for which a credit is
being claimed, a civil penalty was assessed against the taxpayer by the
Department of Environmental Quality for failure to comply with an
order issued by an agency of the Department to abate or remediate a
violation of any program administered by the agency.
b. During the tax year in which the activity occurred for which a credit is
being claimed or in the prior two tax years, any of the following:
1. A finding was made by the Department of Environmental
Quality that the taxpayer knowingly and willfully, as defined
in G.S. 143-215.6B, including all limitations thereto,
committed a violation of any program implemented by an
agency of the Department.
2. An assessment for damages to fish or wildlife pursuant to
G.S. 143-215.3(a)(7) was made against the taxpayer.
3. A judicial order for injunctive relief was issued against the
taxpayer in connection with a violation of any program
implemented by an agency of the Department of
Environmental Quality.
Senate Bill 546-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. During the tax year in which the activity occurred for which the credit
is being claimed or in the prior four tax years, a criminal penalty was
imposed on the taxpayer in connection with a violation of any program
implemented by an agency of the Department of Environmental
Quality.
(10) Establishment. – Defined in 29 C.F.R. § 1904.46, as it existed on January 1,
2002.
(11) Full-time job. – A position that requires at least 1,600 hours of work per year
and is intended to be held by one employee during the entire year. A full-time
employee is an employee who holds a full-time job.
(12) Hub. – Defined in G.S. 105-164.3.
(13) Information technology and services. – Defined in G.S. 143B-437.01.
(14) Long-term unemployed worker. – An individual that has been totally
unemployed for at least the preceding 26 consecutive weeks as evidenced by
records maintained by the Division of Employment Security (DES) of the
Department of Commerce.
(15) Manufacturing. – Defined in G.S. 143B-437.01.
(16) Motorsports facility. – A motorsports racetrack classified in the United States
racetrack national industry 711212, as defined by NAICS.
(17) Motorsports racing team. – A professional racing team primarily engaged in
the research and development, design, manufacture, repair, maintenance, and
operation of motor vehicles used in live motorsports racing events before a
paying audience.
(18) NAICS. – Defined in G.S. 105-228.90.
(19) New job. – A full-time job that represents a net increase in the number of the
taxpayer's employees statewide. A new employee is an employee who holds
a new job. The term does not include a job currently located in this State that
is transferred to the business from a related member of the business.
(20) Overdue tax debt. – Defined in G.S. 105-243.1.
(20a) Port enhancement zone. – Defined in G.S. 143B-437.013.
(21) Purchase. – Defined in section 179 of the Code.
(21a) Qualifying clean energy manufacturer. – A manufacturer of small modular
reactors, small modular reactor components, reactor modules, or nuclear fuel
assemblies located in this State.
(22) Related member. – Defined in G.S. 105-130.7A.
(23) Research and development. – An industry in scientific research and
development services industry group 5417 as defined by NAICS.
(24) Urban progress zone. – The classification assigned to an area pursuant to
G.S. 143B-437.09.
(25) Warehousing. – Defined in G.S. 143B-437.01.
(26) Wholesale trade. – Defined in G.S. 143B-437.01.
"§ 105-129.82. (See notes) Sunset; studies.
(a) Sunset. – This Article is repealed effective for business activities that occur on or after
January 1, 2014.
(b) Equity Study. – The Department of Commerce shall study the effect of the tax
incentives provided in this Article on tax equity. This study shall include the following:
(1) Reexamining the formula in G.S. 143B-437.08 used to define development
tiers, to include consideration of alternative measures for more equitable
treatment of counties in similar economic circumstances.
(2) Considering whether the assignment of tiers and the applicable thresholds are
equitable for smaller counties.
Page 6 Senate Bill 546-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Compiling any available data on whether expanding North Carolina
businesses receive fewer benefits than out-of-State businesses that locate to
North Carolina.
(c) Impact Study. – The Department of Commerce shall study the effectiveness of the tax
incentives provided in this Article. This study shall include:
(1) Studying the distribution of tax incentives across new and expanding
businesses and industries.
(2) Examining data on economic recruitment for the period from 2005 through
the most recent year for which data are available by county, by industry type,
by size of investment, and by number of jobs, and other relevant information
to determine the pattern of business locations and expansions before and after
the enactment of this Article.
(3) Measuring the direct costs and benefits of the tax incentives.
(4) Compiling available information on the current use of incentives by other
states and whether that use is increasing or declining.
(d) Report. – The Department of Commerce shall report the results of these studies and
its recommendations to the General Assembly biennially with the first report due by June 1,
2009.2026.
"§ 105-129.83. Eligibility; forfeiture.
(a) Eligible Business. – A taxpayer is eligible for a credit under this Article only with
respect to activities occurring at an establishmenta location whose primary activity is listed in
this subsection. clean energy manufacturing. The primary activity of an establishmenta location
is determined based on the establishment's location's principal product or group of products
produced or distributed, or services rendered.
(1) Air courier services hub.
(2) Aircraft maintenance and repair.
(3) Company headquarters, but only if the additional eligibility requirements of
subsection (b) of this section are satisfied.
(4) Customer service call centers.
(5) Electronic shopping and mail order houses.
(6) Information technology and services.
(7) Manufacturing.
(8) Motorsports facility.
(9) Motorsports racing team.
(10) Research and development.
(11) Warehousing.
(12) Wholesale trade.
(b) Company Headquarters Eligibility. – A taxpayer is eligible for a credit under this
Article with respect to a company headquarters only if the taxpayer creates at least 75 new jobs
at the company headquarters within a 24-month period. A taxpayer that meets this job creation
requirement is eligible for credits under this Article with respect to the company headquarters for
three taxable years beginning with the year in which the job creation requirement is satisfied. A
taxpayer that creates an additional 75 new jobs at the company headquarters in a 24-month period
during a three-year eligibility period does not qualify for any extended eligibility period.
However, a taxpayer that creates an additional 75 new jobs at the company headquarters in a
24-month period after the completion of a three-year eligibility period is eligible for credits with
respect to the company headquarters for an additional three taxable years beginning in the year
in which the additional job creation requirement is satisfied.
(c) Wage Standard. – A taxpayer is eligible for a credit under this Article in a
development tier two or three area only if the taxpayer satisfies a wage standard. The taxpayer is
not required to satisfy a wage standard if the activity occurs in a development tier one area. Jobs
Senate Bill 546-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
that are located within an urban progress zone, a port enhancement zone, or an agrarian growth
zone but not in a development tier one area satisfy the wage standard if they pay an average
weekly wage that is at least equal to ninety percent (90%) of the lesser of the average wage for
all insured private employers in the State and the average wage for all insured private employers
in the county. All other jobs satisfy the wage standard if they pay an average weekly wage that
is at least equal to the lesser of one hundred ten percent (110%) of the average wage for all
insured private employers in the State and ninety percent (90%) of the average wage for all
insured private employers in the county. The Department of Commerce shall annually publish
the wage standard for each county.
In making the wage calculation, the taxpayer shall include any jobs that were filled for at
least 1,600 hours during the calendar year the taxpayer engages in the activity that qualifies for
the credit even if those jobs are not filled at the time the taxpayer claims the credit. For a taxpayer
with a taxable year other than a calendar year, the taxpayer shall use the wage standard for the
calendar year in which the taxable year begins. Only full-time jobs are included when making
the wage calculation.
(d) Health Insurance. – A taxpayer is eligible for a credit under this Article only if the
taxpayer provides health insurance for all of the full-time jobs at the establishment location with
respect to which the credit is claimed when the taxpayer engages in the activity that qualifies for
the credit. For the purposes of this subsection, a taxpayer provides health insurance if it pays at
least fifty percent (50%) of the premiums for health care coverage that equals or exceeds the
minimum provisions of the basic health care plan of coverage recommended by the Small
Employer Carrier Committee pursuant to G.S. 58-50-125.requirements for small group health
benefit plans under State or federal law.
Each year that a taxpayer claims a credit or carryforward of a credit allowed under this
Article, the taxpayer shall provide with the tax return the taxpayer's certification that the taxpayer
continues to provide health insurance for all the jobs at the establishment location with respect
to which the credit was claimed. If the taxpayer ceases to provide health insurance for the jobs
during a taxable year, the credit expires, and the taxpayer may not take any remaining installment
or carryforward of the credit.expires.
(e) Environmental Impact. – A taxpayer is eligible for a credit allowed under this Article
only if the taxpayer certifies that, at the time the taxpayer claims the credit, there has not been a
final determination unfavorable to the taxpayer with respect to an environmental disqualifying
event. For the purposes of this section, a "final determination unfavorable to the taxpayer" occurs
when there is no further opportunity for the taxpayer to seek administrative or judicial appeal,
review, certiorari, or rehearing of the environmental disqualifying event and the disqualifying
event has not been reversed or withdrawn. No later than January 31 of each year, the Secretary
of Environmental Quality shall provide an annual report to the Department listing all
environmental disqualifying events for which a final determination unfavorable to the taxpayer
was made in the prior calendar year and shall provide the name of the taxpayer involved and the
date that the disqualifying event occurred.
(f) Safety and Health Programs. – A taxpayer is eligible for a credit allowed under this
Article only if the taxpayer certifies that, as of the time the taxpayer claims the credit, at the
establishment location with respect to which the credit is claimed, the taxpayer has no citations
under the Occupational Safety and Health Act that have become a final order within the past
three years for willful serious violations or for failing to abate serious violations. For the purposes
of this subsection, "serious violation" has the same meaning as in G.S. 95-127. The
Commissioner of Labor shall notify the Department of Revenue annually of all employers who
have had these citations become final orders within the past three years.
(g) Overdue Tax Debts. – A taxpayer is not eligible for a credit allowed under this Article
if, at the time the taxpayer claims the credit or an installment or carryforward of the credit, the
Page 8 Senate Bill 546-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
taxpayer has received a notice of an overdue tax debt and that overdue tax debt has not been
satisfied or otherwise resolved.
(h) Expiration. – If, during the period that installments of a credit under this Article
accrue, the taxpayer is no longer engaged in one of the types of the business described in
subsection (a) of this section at the establishment location for which the credit was claimed, the
credit expires. If, during the period that installments of a credit under this Article accrue, the
number of jobs of an eligible company headquarters falls below the minimum number required
under subsection (b) of this section, any credit associated with that company headquarters
expires. When a credit expires, the taxpayer may not take any remaining installments of the
credit. The taxpayer may, however, take the portion of an installment that accrued in a previous
year and was carried forward to the extent permitted under G.S. 105-129.84. A change in the
development tier designation of the location of an establishmenta location does not result in
expiration of a credit under this Article.
(i) Forfeiture. – A taxpayer forfeits a credit allowed under this Article if the taxpayer was
not eligible for the credit for the calendar year in which the taxpayer engaged in the activity for
which the credit was claimed. A taxpayer forfeits a credit previously allowed under this Article
if a final determination unfavorable to the taxpayer with respect to an environmental
disqualifying event is made that is applicable to the year in which the activity occurred for which
the credit was claimed. In addition, a taxpayer forfeits a credit for investment in real property
under G.S. 105-129.89 if the taxpayer fails to timely create the number of required new jobs or
to timely make the required level of investment.investment under G.S. 105-129.89(b). A taxpayer
that forfeits a credit under this Article is liable for all past taxes avoided as a result of the credit
plus interest at the rate established under G.S. 105-241.21, computed from the date the taxes
would have been due if the credit had not been allowed. The past taxes and interest are due 30
days after the date the credit is forfeited; a taxpayer that fails to pay the past taxes and interest by
the due date is subject to the penalties provided in G.S. 105-236.
(j) Change in Ownership of Business. – As used in this subsection, the term "business"
means a taxpayer or an establishment.a location. The sale, merger, consolidation, conversion,
acquisition, or bankruptcy of a business, or any transaction by which an existing business
reformulates itself as another business, does not create new eligibility in a succeeding business
with respect to credits for which the predecessor was not eligible under this Article. A successor
business may, however, take any credit or carried-over portion of a credit that its predecessor
could have taken if it had a tax liability. The acquisition of a business is a new investment that
creates new eligibility in the acquiring taxpayer under this Article if any of the following
conditions are met:
(1) The business closed before it was acquired.
(2) The business was required to file a notice of plant closing or mass layoff under
the federal Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, 29 U.S.C. §
2101, before it was acquired.
(3) The business was acquired by its employees directly or indirectly through an
acquisition company under an employee stock option transaction or another
similar mechanism. For the purpose of this subdivision, "acquired" means that
as part of the initial purchase of a business by the employees, the purchase
included an agreement for the employees through the employee stock option
transaction or another similar mechanism to obtain one of the following:
a. Ownership of more than fifty percent (50%) of the business.
b. Ownership of not less than forty percent (40%) of the business within
seven years if the business has tangible assets with a net book value in
excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) and has the
majority of its operations located in a development tier one area.
Senate Bill 546-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(k) Advisory Ruling. – A taxpayer may request in writing from the Secretary of Revenue
specific advice regarding eligibility for a credit under this Article. G.S. 105-264 governs the
effect of this advice. A taxpayer may not legally rely upon advice offered by any other State or
local government official or employee acting in an official capacity regarding eligibility for a
credit under this Article.
(l) Planned Expansion. – A taxpayer that signs a letter of commitment with the
Department of Commerce, after the Department has calculated the development tier designations
for the next year but before the beginning of that year, to undertake specific activities at a specific
site within the next two years may calculate the credit for which it qualifies based on the
establishment's location's development tier designation and urban progress zone, port
enhancement zone, or agrarian growth zone designation in the year in which the letter of
commitment was signed by the taxpayer. If the taxpayer does not engage in the activities within
the two-year period, the taxpayer does not qualify for the credit; however, if the taxpayer later
engages in the activities, the taxpayer qualifies for the credit based on the development tier and
urban progress zone, port enhancement zone, or agrarian growth zone designations designation
in effect at that time.
(m) Qualified Capital Intensive Corporations. – A corporation that is a qualified capital
intensive corporation under G.S. 105-130.4(s1) is not eligible for any credit under this Article
with respect to the facility that satisfies the condition of subdivision (2) of that subsection.
"§ 105-129.84. (See notes) Tax election;liability eligibility; cap; carryforwards; limitations.
(a) Tax Election. –Liability Limitation. – The credits provided in this Article are allowed
against the franchise tax levied in Article 3 of this Chapter, the income taxes levied in Article 4
of this Chapter, and the gross premiums tax levied in Article 8B of this Chapter. The taxpayer
may divide a credit between the taxes against which it is allowed. Carryforwards of a credit may
be divided between the taxes against which it is allowed without regard to the original election
regarding the division of the credit.
(b) Cap. – The credits allowed under this Article may not exceed fifty percent (50%) of
the cumulative amount of taxes against which they may be claimed for the taxable year, reduced
by the sum of all other credits allowed against those taxes, except tax payments made by or on
behalf of the taxpayer. This limitation applies to the cumulative amount of credit, including
carryforwards, claimed by the taxpayer under this Article for the taxable year.
(c) Carryforward. – Unless a longer carryforward period applies, any unused portion of
a credit allowed under G.S. 105-129.87 or G.S. 105-129.88 may be carried forward for the
succeeding five years, and any unused portion of a credit allowed under G.S. 105-129.89 may be
carried forward for the succeeding 15 years. If the Secretary of Commerce makes a written
determination that the taxpayer is expected to purchase or lease, and place in service in
connection with an eligible business within a two-year period, at least one hundred fifty million
dollars ($150,000,000) worth of business and real property, any unused portion of a credit under
this Article with respect to the establishment that satisfies that condition may be carried forward
for the succeeding 20 years. If the taxpayer does not make the required level of investment, the
taxpayer shall apply the standard carryforward period rather than the 20-year carryforward
period.
(d) Statute of Limitations. – Notwithstanding Article 9 of this Chapter, a taxpayer shall
claim a credit under this Article within six months after the date set by statute for the filing of the
return, including any extensions of that date.
(e) Credit Treated as Tax Payment. – The owner of a pass-through entity that claims a
credit under this Article may treat some or all of the credit claimed as a tax payment made by or
on behalf of the taxpayer. A credit claimed that is treated as a tax payment is subject to all
provisions of this section. A credit claimed that is treated as a tax payment does not accrue interest
under G.S. 105-241.21 if the payment is determined to be an overpayment. A taxpayer that elects
Page 10 Senate Bill 546-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to have a credit claimed under this Article treated as a tax payment must make this election when
the return is filed.
"§ 105-129.85. (See notes) Fees and reports.
(a) Fee. – When filing a return for a taxable year in which the taxpayer engaged in activity
for which the taxpayer is eligible for a credit under this Article, the taxpayer shall pay the
Department of Revenue a fee of five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each type ofthe credit the
taxpayer claims or intends to claim with respect to an establishment.a location. The fee is due at
the time the return is due for the taxable year in which the taxpayer engaged in the activity for
which the taxpayer is eligible for a credit. No credit is allowed under this Article for a taxable
year until all outstanding fees have been paid. Fees collected under this section shall be credited
to the General Fund.
(b) Report. – The Department must include in the economic incentives report required by
G.S. 105-256 the following information itemized by credit and by taxpayer:
(1) The number and amount of credits generated and taken for each credit allowed
in this Article.
(2) The number and development tier area of new jobs with respect to which
credits were generated and to which credits were taken.
(3) The cost and development tier area of business property with respect to which
credits were generated and to which credits were taken.
(4) The cost and development tier area of real property investment with respect
to which credits were generated and to which credits were taken.
"§ 105-129.86. (See notes) Substantiation.
(a) Records. – To claim a credit allowed by this Article, the taxpayer shall provide any
information required by the Secretary of Revenue. Every taxpayer claiming a credit under this
Article shall maintain and make available for inspection by the Secretary of Revenue any records
the Secretary considers necessary to determine and verify the amount of the credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled. The burden of proving eligibility for the credit and the amount of the credit
shall rest upon the taxpayer, and no credit shall be allowed to a taxpayer that fails to maintain
adequate records or to make them available for inspection.
(b) Documentation. – Each taxpayer shall provide with the tax return qualifying
information for each credit claimed under this Article. The qualifying information shall be in the
form prescribed by the Secretary and shall be signed and affirmed by the individual who signs
the taxpayer's tax return. The information required by this subsection is information
demonstrating that the taxpayer has met the conditions for qualifying for a credit and any
carryforwards and includes the following:
(1) The physical location of the jobs and investment with respect to which the
credit is claimed, including the street address and the development tier
designation of the establishment.location.
(2) The type of business with respect to which the credit is claimed and the
average weekly wage at the establishment location with respect to which the
credit is claimed.
(3) Any other qualifying information related to a specific credit allowed under
this Article.
"§ 105-129.87. (See notes) Credit for creating jobs.
(a) Credit. – A taxpayer that meets the eligibility requirements set out in G.S. 105-129.83
and satisfies the threshold requirement for new job creation in this State under subsection (b) of
this section during the taxable year is allowed a credit for creating jobs. The amount of the credit
for each new job created is set out in the table below and is based on the development tier
designation of the county in which the job is located. If the job is located in an urban progress
zone, a port enhancement zone, or an agrarian growth zone, the amount of the credit is increased
by one thousand dollars ($1,000) per job. In addition, if a job located in an urban progress zone,
Senate Bill 546-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a port enhancement zone, or an agrarian growth zone is filled by a resident of that zone or by a
long-term unemployed worker, the amount of the credit is increased by an additional two
thousand dollars ($2,000) per job.
Area Development Tier Amount of Credit
Tier One $12,500
Tier Two 5,000
Tier Three 750
(b) Threshold. – The applicable threshold is the appropriate amount set out in the
following table based on the development tier designation of the county where the new jobs are
created during the taxable year. If the taxpayer creates new jobs at more than one eligible
establishment in a county during the taxable year, the threshold applies to the aggregate number
of new jobs created at all eligible establishments within the county during that year. If the
taxpayer creates new jobs at eligible establishments in different counties during the taxable year,
the threshold applies separately to the aggregate number of new jobs created at eligible
establishments in each county. If the taxpayer creates new jobs in an urban progress zone, a port
enhancement zone, or an agrarian growth zone, the applicable threshold is the one for a
development tier one area. New jobs created in an urban progress zone, a port enhancement zone,
or an agrarian growth zone are not aggregated with jobs created at any other eligible
establishments regardless of county.
Area Development Tier Threshold
Tier One 5
Tier Two 10
Tier Three 15
(c) Calculation. – A job is located in a county, an urban progress zone, a port
enhancement zone, or an agrarian growth zone if more than fifty percent (50%) of the employee's
duties are performed in the county or the zone. The number of new jobs a taxpayer creates during
the taxable year is determined by subtracting the average number of full-time employees the
taxpayer had in this State during the 12-month period preceding the beginning of the taxable year
from the average number of full-time employees the taxpayer has in this State during the taxable
year.
(d) Installments. – The credit may not be taken in the taxable year in which the new jobs
are created. Instead, the credit shall be taken in equal installments over the four years following
the taxable year in which the new jobs were created and is conditional upon the continued
maintenance of those jobs by the taxpayer. If, in one of the four years in which the installment of
a credit accrues, a job is no longer filled, the credit with respect to that job expires, and the
taxpayer may not take any remaining installment of the credit with respect to that job. If, in one
of the years in which the installment of a credit accrues, the number of the taxpayer's full-time
employees falls below the sum of the applicable threshold and the number of full-time employees
the taxpayer had in the year before the year in which the taxpayer qualified for the credit, the
credits with respect to all of the new jobs expire, and the taxpayer may not take any remaining
installments of the credits. When a credit expires under this subsection, the taxpayer may,
however, take the portion of an installment that accrued in a previous year and was carried
forward to the extent permitted under G.S. 105-129.84.
(e) Transferred Jobs. – Jobs transferred from one area in the State to another area in the
State are not considered new jobs for purposes of this section. Jobs that were located in this State
and that are transferred to the taxpayer from a related member of the taxpayer are not considered
new jobs for purposes of this section. If, in one of the four years in which the installment of a
credit accrues, the job with respect to which the credit was claimed is moved to an area in a
higher-numbered development tier or out of an urban progress zone, a port enhancement zone,
or an agrarian growth zone, the remaining installments of the credit are allowed only to the extent
they would have been allowed if the job was initially created in the area to which it was moved.
Page 12 Senate Bill 546-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
If, in one of the years in which the installment of a credit accrues, the job with respect to which
the credit was claimed is moved to an area in a lower-numbered development tier or an urban
progress zone, a port enhancement zone, or an agrarian growth zone, the remaining installments
of the credit shall be calculated as if the job had been created initially in the area to which it was
moved.
(f) Wage Standard. – For the purposes of this section, a taxpayer satisfies the wage
standard requirement of G.S. 105-129.83 only if the taxpayer satisfies the requirement with
respect to both the new jobs, considered collectively, for which a credit is claimed and all of the
jobs at the establishment, considered collectively, with respect to which a credit is claimed.
(g) No Double Credit. – A taxpayer may not claim a credit under this section with respect
to jobs for which a taxpayer claims a credit under G.S. 105-129.8.
"§ 105-129.88. (See notes) Credit for investing in business property.
(a) General Credit. – A taxpayer that meets the eligibility requirements set out in
G.S. 105-129.83 and that has purchased or leased business property and placed it in service in
this State during the taxable year and that has satisfied the threshold requirements of subsection
(c) of this section is allowed a credit equal to the applicable percentage of the excess of the
eligible investment amount over the applicable threshold. If the taxpayer places business property
in service in an urban progress zone, a port enhancement zone, or an agrarian growth zone, the
applicable percentage is the one for a development tier one area. Business property is eligible if
it is not leased to another party. The credit may not be taken for the taxable year in which the
business property is placed in service but shall be taken in equal installments over the four years
following the taxable year in which it is placed in service. The applicable percentage is as
follows:
Area Development Tier Applicable Percentage
Tier One 7%
Tier Two 5%
Tier Three 3.5%
(b) Eligible Investment Amount. – The eligible investment amount is the lesser of (i) the
cost of the eligible business property and (ii) the amount by which the cost of all of the taxpayer's
eligible business property that is in service in this State on the last day of the taxable year exceeds
the cost of all of the taxpayer's eligible business property that was in service in this State on the
last day of the base year. The base year is that year, of the three immediately preceding taxable
years, in which the taxpayer had the most eligible business property in service in this State.
(c) Threshold. – The applicable threshold is the appropriate amount set out in the
following table based on the development tier where the eligible business property is placed in
service during the taxable year. If the taxpayer places business property in service in an urban
progress zone, a port enhancement zone, or an agrarian growth zone, the applicable threshold is
the one for a development tier one area. Business property placed in service in an urban progress
zone, a port enhancement zone, or an agrarian growth zone is not aggregated with business
property placed in service at any other eligible establishments regardless of county. If the
taxpayer places eligible business property in service at more than one establishment in a county
during the taxable year, the threshold applies to the aggregate amount of eligible business
property placed in service during the taxable year at all establishments in the county. If the
taxpayer places eligible business property in service at establishments in different counties, the
threshold applies separately to the aggregate amount of eligible business property placed in
service in each county. If the taxpayer places eligible business property in service at an
establishment over the course of a two-year period, the applicable threshold for the second
taxable year is reduced by the eligible investment amount for the previous taxable year.
Area Development Tier Threshold
Tier One $ -0-
Tier Two 1,000,000
Senate Bill 546-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Tier Three 2,000,000
(d) Expiration. – As used in this subsection, the term "disposed of" means disposed of,
taken out of service, or moved out of State. If, in one of the four years in which the installment
of a credit accrues, the business property with respect to which the credit was claimed is disposed
of, the credit expires, and the taxpayer may not take any remaining installment of the credit for
that business property unless the cost of that business property is offset in the same taxable year
by the taxpayer's new investment in eligible business property placed in service in the same
county, as provided in this subsection. If, during the taxable year, the taxpayer disposed of the
business property for which installments remain, there has been a net reduction in the cost of all
the taxpayer's eligible business property that are in service in the same county as the business
property that was disposed of, and the amount of this reduction is greater than twenty percent
(20%) of the cost of the business property that was disposed of, then the credit for the business
property that was disposed of expires. If the amount of the net reduction is equal to twenty percent
(20%) or less of the cost of the business property that was disposed of, or if there is no net
reduction, then the credit does not expire. In determining the amount of any net reduction during
the taxable year, the cost of business property the taxpayer placed in service during the taxable
year and for which the taxpayer claims a credit under Article 3A or Article 3B of this Chapter
may not be included in the cost of all the taxpayer's eligible business property that is in service.
If in a single taxable year business property with respect to two or more credits in the same county
are disposed of, the net reduction in the cost of all the taxpayer's eligible business property that
is in service in the same county is compared to the total cost of all the business property for which
credits expired in order to determine whether the remaining installments of the credits are
forfeited.
The expiration of a credit does not prevent the taxpayer from taking the portion of an
installment that accrued in a previous year and was carried forward to the extent permitted under
G.S. 105-129.84.
(e) Transferred Property. – If, in one of the four years in which the installment of a credit
accrues, the business property with respect to which the credit was claimed is moved to a county
in a higher-numbered development tier or out of an urban progress zone, a port enhancement
zone, or an agrarian growth zone, the remaining installments of the credit are allowed only to the
extent they would have been allowed if the business property had been placed in service initially
in the area to which it was moved. If, in one of the four years in which the installment of a credit
accrues, the business property with respect to which a credit was claimed is moved to a county
in a lower-numbered development tier or an urban progress zone, a port enhancement zone, or
an agrarian growth zone, the remaining installments of the credit shall be calculated as if the
business property had been placed in service initially in the area to which it was moved.
(f) Wage Standard. – For the purposes of this section, a taxpayer satisfies the wage
standard requirement of G.S. 105-129.83 only if the taxpayer satisfies the requirement with
respect to all of the jobs at the establishment, considered collectively, with respect to which a
credit is claimed.
(g) No Double Credit. – A taxpayer may not claim a credit under this section with respect
to business property for which the taxpayer claims a credit under G.S. 105-129.9 or
G.S. 105-129.9A.
"§ 105-129.89. (See notes) Credit for investment in real property.
(a) Credit. – If a taxpayer that has purchased or leased real property in a development tier
one area begins to use the property in an eligible business during the taxable year, the taxpayer
is allowed a credit equal to thirty percent (30%) of the eligible investment amount if all of the
eligibility requirements of G.S. 105-129.83 and of subsection (b) of this section are met. For the
purposes of this section, property is located in a development tier one area if the area the property
is located in was a development tier one area at the time the taxpayer made a written application
for the determination required under subsection (b) of this section. The eligible investment
Page 14 Senate Bill 546-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
amount is the lesser of (i) the cost of the property and (ii) the amount by which the cost of all of
the real property the taxpayer is using in this State in an eligible business on the last day of the
taxable year exceeds the cost of all of the real property the taxpayer was using in this State in an
eligible business on the last day of the base year. The base year is that year, of the three
immediately preceding taxable years, in which the taxpayer was using the most real property in
this State in an eligible business. In the case of property that is leased, the cost of the property is
not determined as provided in G.S. 105-129.81 but is considered to be the taxpayer's lease
payments over a seven-year period, plus any expenditures made by the taxpayer to improve the
property before it is used by the taxpayer if the expenditures are not reimbursed or credited by
the lessor. The entire credit may not be taken for the taxable year in which the property is first
used in an eligible business but shall be taken in equal installments over the seven years following
the taxable year in which the property is first used in an eligible business. When part of the
property is first used in an eligible business in one year and part is first used in an eligible business
in a later year, separate credits may be claimed for the amount of property first used in an eligible
business in each year. The basis in any real property for which a credit is allowed under this
section shall be reduced by the amount of credit allowable.
(b) Determination by the Secretary of Commerce. – A taxpayer is eligible for the credit
allowed under this section with respect to an establishment only if the Secretary of Commerce
makes a written determination that the taxpayer is expected to purchase or lease and use in an
eligible business at that establishment within a three-year period at least ten million dollars
($10,000,000) of real property and that the establishment that is the subject of the credit will
create at least 200 new jobs within two years of the time that the property is first used in an
eligible business. If the taxpayer fails to timely make the required level of investment or fails to
timely create the required number of new jobs, the taxpayer forfeits the credit as provided in G.S.
105-129.83.
(c) Mixed Use Property. – If the taxpayer uses only part of the property in an eligible
business, the amount of the credit allowed under this section is reduced by multiplying it by a
fraction, the numerator of which is the square footage of the property used in an eligible business
and the denominator of which is the total square footage of the property.
(d) Expiration. – If, in one of the seven years in which the installment of a credit accrues,
the property with respect to which the credit was claimed is no longer used in an eligible business,
the credit expires, and the taxpayer may not take any remaining installment of the credit. If, in
one of the seven years in which the installment of a credit accrues, part of the property with
respect to which the credit was claimed is no longer used in an eligible business, the remaining
installments of the credit shall be reduced by multiplying it by the fraction described in subsection
(c) of this section. If, in one of the years in which the installment of a credit accrues and by which
the taxpayer is required to have created 200 new jobs at the property, the total number of
employees the taxpayer employs at the property with respect to which the credit is claimed is less
than 200, the credit expires, and the taxpayer may not take any remaining installment of the
credit.
In each of these cases, the taxpayer may nonetheless take the portion of an installment that
accrued in a previous year and was carried forward to the extent permitted under G.S.
105-129.84.
(e) No Double Credit. – A taxpayer may not claim a credit under this section with respect
to real property for which a credit is claimed under G.S. 105-129.12 or G.S. 105-129.12A.
"§ 105-129.90. Credit for clean energy manufacturing.
(a) Credit. – A qualifying clean energy manufacturer that (i) meets the eligibility
requirements set out in G.S. 105-129.83 and (ii) satisfies the requirements for new job creation
and investment under this subsection during the taxable year is allowed a credit for clean energy
manufacturing. The amount of the credit is equal to a percentage of the qualifying clean energy
Senate Bill 546-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
manufacturer's cumulative amount of income taxes for the taxable year for a number of years, as
follows:
Job Threshold Investment Threshold Years of Credit
25 $1,500,000 3
50 $2,500,000 4
100 $5,000,000 5
The applicable percentage is fifty percent (50%) if the location is a retired fossil fuel plant
site located in the State with existing transmission infrastructure and cooling water access, and
the applicable percentage is thirty percent (Y30) for any other location.
(b) Job Calculation Provisions. – The following provisions apply to the job threshold
provided in subsection (a) of this section:
(1) If the taxpayer creates new jobs at more than one eligible location
establishment in the State during the taxable year, the threshold applies to the
aggregate number of new jobs created at all eligible locations establishments
within the eligible counties during that year.
(2) A job is located in a county if more than fifty percent (50%) of the employee's
duties are performed in the county. The number of new jobs a taxpayer creates
during the taxable year is determined by subtracting the average number of
full-time employees the taxpayer had in this State during the 12-month period
preceding the beginning of the taxable year from the average number of
full-time employees the taxpayer has in this State during the taxable year.
(3) Jobs transferred from one area in the State to another area in the State are not
considered new jobs for purposes of this section. Jobs that were located in this
State and that are transferred to the taxpayer from a related member of the
taxpayer are not considered new jobs for purposes of this section. If the job
with respect to which the credit was claimed is moved to a development tier
three area, the remaining installments of the credit are not allowed.
(4) For the purposes of this section, a taxpayer satisfies the wage standard
requirement of G.S. 105-129.83 only if the taxpayer satisfies the requirement
with respect to both the new jobs, considered collectively, for which a credit
is claimed and all of the jobs at the location, considered collectively, with
respect to which a credit is claimed.
(c) Investment Provisions. – The following provisions apply to the investment threshold
provided in subsection (a) of this section:
(1) The investment threshold with private funds invested in the form of (i)
purchasing or leasing business property and placing it in service in this State
during the taxable year or (ii) purchasing or leasing real property in this State
and beginning to use the property during the taxable year.
(2) Business property is eligible if it is not leased to another party. The eligible
investment amount is the lesser of (i) the cost of the eligible business property
and (ii) the amount by which the cost of all of the taxpayer's eligible business
property that is in service in this State on the last day of the taxable year
exceeds the cost of all of the taxpayer's eligible business property that was in
service in this State on the last day of the base year. The base year is that year,
of the three immediately preceding taxable years, in which the taxpayer had
the most eligible business property in service in this State. If the taxpayer
places eligible business property in service at locations in different counties
and some of the locations are in development tier three areas, the investment
calculation will be reduced proportionately. If the taxpayer places eligible
business property in service at a location over the course of more than one
Page 16 Senate Bill 546-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
year, the applicable threshold for each subsequent taxable year is reduced by
the eligible investment amount for the previous taxable years.
(3) Real property is located in the development tier area applicable to the county
at the time the taxpayer made a written application for the determination
required under this Article. The eligible investment amount is the lesser of (i)
the cost of the property and (ii) the amount by which the cost of all of the real
property the taxpayer is using in this State in an eligible business on the last
day of the taxable year exceeds the cost of all of the real property the taxpayer
was using in this State in an eligible business on the last day of the base year.
The base year is that year, of the three immediately preceding taxable years,
in which the taxpayer was using the most real property in this State in an
eligible business. In the case of property that is leased, the cost of the property
is considered to be the taxpayer's lease payments for the years for which the
credit is given, plus any expenditures made by the taxpayer to improve the
property before it is used by the taxpayer if the expenditures are not
reimbursed or credited by the lessor. When part of the property is first used in
one year and part is first used in a later year, separate credits may be claimed
for the amount of property first used in an eligible business in each year. The
basis in any real property for which a credit is allowed under this section shall
be reduced by the amount of credit allowable. If the taxpayer uses only part
of the property in clean energy manufacturing, the amount of the credit
allowed under this section is reduced by multiplying it by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the square footage of the property used in clean energy
manufacturing and the denominator of which is the total square footage of the
property.
(4) If, in one of the years in which the credit remains, the property with respect to
which the credit was claimed is no longer used in clean energy manufacturing,
the credit expires and the taxpayer is not allowed the credit in any years
remaining. If, in one of the years in which the credit remains, a part of the
property with respect to which the credit was claimed is no longer used in
clean energy manufacturing and that amount reduces the number of years
calculated for the credit, only remaining years for the lower calculation may
be claimed."
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2025. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 546-First Edition Page 17